zh-CN: 表圈刻度单位: 度; 双刻度; 密位; 其他
el: Μονάδες διαβάθμισης δακτυλίου: Μοίρες; Διπλή κλίμακα; Mils; Άλλο
ja: ベゼル目盛単位: 度; デュアルスケール; ミル; その他
ru: Единицы шкалы вращающегося безеля: Градусы; Двойная шкала; Тысячные; Другое
ro-RO: Unități de gradare a ramei: Grade; Scală dublă; Miimi; Altele
sl-SI: Enote merjenja na obroču: Stopinje; Dvojna lestvica; Mil; Drugo
bg-BG: Единици на деление на безела.: Градуси; Двойна скала; Мили; Друго
fr: Unités de graduation de la lunette: Degrés; Double échelle; Millièmes; Autre
fi: Kehyksen asteikkoyksiköt: Asteet; Kaksiosainen asteikko; Piirut; Muu
nb: Bezel-graderingsenheter: Grader; Dobbel skala; Mils; Annet
nl: Bezel schaalverdelingseenheden: Graden; Dubbele schaal; Mils; Overige
sv: Bezel-graderingsenheter: Grader; Dubbel skala; Mil (streck); Övrigt
cs: Jednotky odstupňování lunety: Stupně; Dvojitá stupnice; Mils; Jiné
de: Teilungseinheiten der Lünette: Grad; Doppelskala; Mils; Sonstige
zh-TW: 錶圈刻度單元: 度; 雙刻度; 密耳; 其他
pt-PT: Unidades de graduação do aro: Graus; Escala dupla; Mils; Outro
hr-HR: Jedinice podjele na rotirajućem prstenu: Stupnjevi; Dvostruka skala; Miliradijani; Ostalo
ko: 베젤 눈금 단위: 도; 듀얼 스케일; 밀; 기타
da: Graduering på bezel-enheder: Grader; Dobbelt skala; Mils; Andet
th: หน่วยวัดบนขอบหน้าปัด: องศา; สเกลคู่; มิล; อื่นๆ
es: Unidades de graduación del bisel: Grados; Escala doble; Milésimas (mils); Otro
lt-LT: Žiedo matavimo padalos: Laipsniai; Dviguba skalė; Mils (tūkstantosios); Kita
it: Unità di graduazione della lunetta: Gradi; Doppia scala; Millesimi; Altro
hu: Bezel osztásegységek: Fok; Kettős skála; Mil; Egyéb
en: Bezel graduation units: Degrees; Dual Scale; Mils; Other
sk-SK: Jednotky stupňovania fazetky: Stupne; Duálna mierka; Dielce; Iné
pl: Jednostki skali bezela: Stopnie; Podwójna skala; Tysięczne; Inne
vi: Đơn vị chia vạch trên vòng xoay: Độ; Thang đo kép; Mil; Khác
tr: Çerçeve derecelendirme birimleri: Derece; Çift ölçek; Mil; Diğer
pt-BR: Unidades de graduação do aro: Graus; Escala dupla; Milésimos (mils); Outros